Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 504, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 504. (a) A. The Board shall elect from its members a
chairman chair, vice chairman chair, and a secretary. It shall
adopt rules and regulations for its government and may adopt an
official seal for the Department. Members shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses, as provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act
Req. No. 12417 Page 1

whil e attending meetings of the Board or while performing other
official duties.
(b) B. The Board shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) 1. To establish policies for the operation of the
Department;
(2) 2. To establish and maintain such institutions as are
necessary or convenient for the operation of programs for the
education, training, vocational education and rehabilitation of
prisoners under the jurisdiction of the Department;
(3) 3. To lease, from time to time, without restriction as to
terms, any property which said Board shall determine advisable to
more fully carry into effect the operation of prison industries;
(4) 4. To acquire, construct, extend, improve, maintain and
operate any and all facilities of all kinds which in the judgment of
the Board shall be necessary or convenient to foster the prison
industries program;
(5) 5. To require the Director and any other personnel of the
Department, when deemed necessary by the Board, to give bond for the
faithful performance of their duties;
(6) 6. To appoint and fix the salary of the Director;
(7) 7. To enter into contracts with private prison contractors;
and
(8) 8. To provide training to employees of private prison
contractors and other governmental entities on a fee basis; and
Req. No. 12417 Page 2

9. To provide oversight of the operations of the Office of the
Inspector General within the Department. The Board shall define the
duties of the Inspector General, who shall report directly to the
Board.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 507, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 507. The Director shall be the executive officer of the
Department and of Corrections and shall report directly to the State
Board of Corrections. The Director shall have the following general
powers and duties:
(a) 1. To supervise the activities of the Department and,
subject to the policies established by the Board, to act for the
Department in all matters, except as may be otherwise provided in
this act.
(b) 2. To prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of
the Department, consistent with the general policies established by
the Board.
(c) 3. To appoint and fix the duties and salaries of such
personnel for the Department as may be necessary to administer and
carry out the provisions of this act. The Department and the
employees thereof, except the members of the Board and the Director
shall be subject to the provisions of the State Merit System of
Personnel Administration, but the Governor may by Executive Order
exempt positions therefrom as authorized by Section 802 of Title 74
Req. No. 12417 Page 3

of t he Oklahoma Statutes, except as may be otherwise provided in
this act.
(d) 4. To accept, use, disburse and administer grants,
allotments, gifts, devises, bequests, appropriations and other
monies and property offered or given to the Department, or any
component or agency thereof, by any agency of the federal government
or any corporation or individual for the use of the Department.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 509.7 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Upon the effective date of this act, elected state officials who
are visiting facilities operated by the Department of Corrections
shall not be required to sign or comply with a nondisclosure
agreement or confidentiality agreement prohibiting or otherwise
restricting such elected state official from reporting or commenting
on the conditions or operations of the facility under the control of
the Department.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12417 GRS 02/05/25




Req. No. 12417 Page 4